Utah statutes.
7-22-105.   Bond required.
(1)  Before furnishing any escrow services, each escrow agent shall file with
the commissioner a surety bond in accordance with the following schedule:
Monthly Average                                 Minimum
Escrow Liability                                        Surety Bond
Up to $10,000                                           $10,000
$10,001 to 20,000                                       $20,000
$20,001 to 30,000                                       $30,000
$30,001 to 40,000                                       $40,000
Above $40,000                                   $50,000
(2)  The surety bond shall name as beneficiaries:
(a)  this state for payment of any costs incurred and charges made in
connection with any escrow agent's insolvency or default, including costs and
charges relating to an examination and receivership of any escrow agent; and
(b)  when all claims and charges of the state have been paid in full, any
person who has a claim against the surety on the bond based on any default or
violation of any duty or obligation of the escrow agent.
(3)  The total aggregate liability on the bond from all claims including legal
fees and other costs incurred in connection with the bond may not exceed the
amount of the bond.
(4)  An applicant for registration as an escrow agent may, in lieu of and
subject to the same surety conditions described in Subsection (2), deposit
assets with or provide a letter of credit to the commissioner in the amount of
the minimum surety bond required in Subsection (1).
